public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/test.aff
FLAG long
# vèrbi -<is>ír/-ír
# themeT1 + r/a0a1a2e0e1e2E0E1E2
# themeT8 + o/e0e1e2E0E1E2J0
SFX e0 Y 227
SFX e0 0 me/G0 ir
SFX e0 ir a/E0E1E2 ir
SFX e0 ir arane/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir aratu/M0 ir
SFX e0 ir arave/F0 ir
SFX e0 ir aremo/E0E1E2J0 ir
SFX e0 ir aren/J0 ir
SFX e0 ir arene/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir arense ir
SFX e0 ir aresi/N0 ir
SFX e0 ir aresiu/O0 ir
SFX e0 ir arion/J0 ir
SFX e0 ir arione/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir arionse ir
SFX e0 ir arisen/J0 ir
SFX e0 ir arisene/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir arisense ir
SFX e0 ir arisi/N0 ir
SFX e0 ir arision/J0 ir
SFX e0 ir arisione/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir arisionse ir
SFX e0 ir arisiu/O0 ir
SFX e0 ir arisié/N0 ir
SFX e0 ir arisiéu/O0 ir
SFX e0 ir arison/J0 ir
SFX e0 ir arisone/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir arisonse ir
SFX e0 ir arié/N0 ir
SFX e0 ir ariéu/O0 ir
SFX e0 ir aron/J0 ir
SFX e0 ir arone/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir aronse ir
SFX e0 ir arà/F0J0L0 ir
SFX e0 ir aràe/F0 ir
SFX e0 ir aràvene/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir arè/J0 ir
SFX e0 ir arène/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir aré/N0 ir
SFX e0 ir arémoe/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir arémome/G0 ir
SFX e0 ir arémomene/G0 ir
SFX e0 ir arésimo/J0 ir
SFX e0 ir arésimoe/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir arésitu/M0 ir
SFX e0 ir aréu/O0 ir
SFX e0 ir aría/F0J0L0 ir
SFX e0 ir aríane/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir aríatu/M0 ir
SFX e0 ir aríe/F0J0 ir
SFX e0 ir aríene/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir arísitu/M0 ir
SFX e0 ir arò/J0 ir
SFX e0 ir aròe/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir e/E0E1E2F0I0J0 ir
SFX e0 ir ede/N0 ir
SFX e0 ir ege/N0 ir
SFX e0 ir en/J0 ir
SFX e0 ir endo/E0E1E2 ir
SFX e0 ir ene/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir ense ir
SFX e0 ir ente/T0I0 ir
SFX e0 ir ento ir
SFX e0 ir ento/E0E1E2 ir
SFX e0 ir erane/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir eratu/M0 ir
SFX e0 ir erave/F0 ir
SFX e0 ir eremo/E0E1E2J0 ir
SFX e0 ir eren/J0 ir
SFX e0 ir erene/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir erense ir
SFX e0 ir eresi/N0 ir
SFX e0 ir eresiu/O0 ir
SFX e0 ir erion/J0 ir
SFX e0 ir erione/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir erionse ir
SFX e0 ir erisen/J0 ir
SFX e0 ir erisene/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir erisense ir
SFX e0 ir erisi/N0 ir
SFX e0 ir erision/J0 ir
SFX e0 ir erisione/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir erisionse ir
SFX e0 ir erisiu/O0 ir
SFX e0 ir erisié/N0 ir
SFX e0 ir erisiéu/O0 ir
SFX e0 ir erison/J0 ir
SFX e0 ir erisone/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir erisonse ir
SFX e0 ir erié/N0 ir
SFX e0 ir eriéu/O0 ir
SFX e0 ir eron/J0 ir
SFX e0 ir erone/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir eronse ir
SFX e0 ir erà/F0J0L0 ir
SFX e0 ir eràe/F0 ir
SFX e0 ir eràvene/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir erè/J0 ir
SFX e0 ir erène/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir eré/N0 ir
SFX e0 ir erémoe/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir erémome/G0 ir
SFX e0 ir erémomene/G0 ir
SFX e0 ir erésimo/J0 ir
SFX e0 ir erésimoe/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir erésitu/M0 ir
SFX e0 ir eréu/O0 ir
SFX e0 ir ería/F0J0L0 ir
SFX e0 ir eríane/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir eríatu/M0 ir
SFX e0 ir eríe/F0J0 ir
SFX e0 ir eríene/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir erísitu/M0 ir
SFX e0 ir erò/J0 ir
SFX e0 ir eròe/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir ese/I0T0 ir
SFX e0 ir esto/B0I0 ir
SFX e0 ir eva/F0J0N0 ir
SFX e0 ir eve/J0 ir
SFX e0 ir evi/J0L0N0 ir
SFX e0 ir evo/J0 ir
SFX e0 ir o/J0 ir
SFX e0 ir on/E0E1E2J0 ir
SFX e0 ir one/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir onme/G0G1 ir
SFX e0 ir é/F0N0 ir
SFX e0 ir éa/F0J0N0 ir
SFX e0 ir éane/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir éau/O0 ir
SFX e0 ir ée/J0 ir
SFX e0 ir éene/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir éi/J0L0N0 ir
SFX e0 ir éimo/J0 ir
SFX e0 ir éimoe/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir éitu/M0 ir
SFX e0 ir éndome/G0 ir
SFX e0 ir éndomene/G0 ir
SFX e0 ir éntome/G0 ir
SFX e0 ir éntomene/G0 ir
SFX e0 ir éo/J0 ir
SFX e0 ir éone/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir ésimo ir
SFX e0 ir éu/O0 ir
SFX e0 ir évane/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir évau/O0 ir
SFX e0 ir évene/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir évimo/J0 ir
SFX e0 ir évimoe/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir évitu/M0 ir
SFX e0 ir évone/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir í/F0N0 ir
SFX e0 ir ía/F0J0N0 ir
SFX e0 ir íane/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir íau/O0 ir
SFX e0 ir íe/J0 ir
SFX e0 ir íene/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir íi/J0L0N0 ir
SFX e0 ir íimo/J0 ir
SFX e0 ir íimoe/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir íitu/M0 ir
SFX e0 ir ímoe/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir índome/G0 ir
SFX e0 ir índomene/G0 ir
SFX e0 ir íntome/G0 ir
SFX e0 ir íntomene/G0 ir
SFX e0 ir ío/J0 ir
SFX e0 ir íone/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir ísene/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir ísime/G0 ir
SFX e0 ir ísimene/G0 ir
SFX e0 ir ísimo ir
SFX e0 ir ísitu/M0 ir
SFX e0 ir ísome/G0 ir
SFX e0 ir ísomene/G0 ir
SFX e0 ir ísone/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir íu/O0 ir
SFX e0 ir ívane/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir ívau/O0 ir
SFX e0 ir ívene/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir ívimo/J0 ir
SFX e0 ir ívimoe/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir ívitu/M0 ir
SFX e0 ir ívone/K0 ir
SFX e0 ir ónmene/G0 ir
SFX e0 r 0/E0E1E2F0L0 ir
SFX e0 r do/B0 ir
SFX e0 r ede/N0 ir
SFX e0 r ege/N0 ir
SFX e0 r me/G0 ir
SFX e0 r mo/J0 ir
SFX e0 r on/E0E1E2J0 [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX e0 r one/K0 [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX e0 r onme/G0G1 [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX e0 r sa/E0E1E2 ir
SFX e0 r se/E0E1E2F0I0J0 ir
SFX e0 r sede/N0 ir
SFX e0 r sege/N0 ir
SFX e0 r sen/J0 ir
SFX e0 r sene/K0 ir
SFX e0 r sense ir
SFX e0 r si/E0E1E2F0L0 ir
SFX e0 r siede/N0 ir
SFX e0 r siege/N0 ir
SFX e0 r sion/J0 ir
SFX e0 r sione/K0 ir
SFX e0 r sionse ir
SFX e0 r sié/N0 ir
SFX e0 r so/E0E1E2J0 ir
SFX e0 r son/J0 ir
SFX e0 r sone/K0 ir
SFX e0 r sonse ir
SFX e0 r sé/N0 ir
SFX e0 r séu/O0 ir
SFX e0 r tu/M0 ir
SFX e0 r ven/J0 ir
SFX e0 r vene/K0 ir
SFX e0 r vense ir
SFX e0 r vion/J0 ir
SFX e0 r vione/K0 ir
SFX e0 r vionse ir
SFX e0 r vié/N0 ir
SFX e0 r viéu/O0 ir
SFX e0 r von/J0 ir
SFX e0 r vone/K0 ir
SFX e0 r vonse ir
SFX e0 r é/N0 ir
SFX e0 r éu/O0 ir
SFX e0 r ónmene/G0 [^cijɉñ]ir

# vèrbi -<is>ír/-ír
# themeT1 + r/a0a1a2e0e1e2E0E1E2
# themeT8 + o/e0e1e2E0E1E2J0
SFX e1 Y 49
SFX e1 0 lo/G1 ir
SFX e1 ir aralo/B0 ir
SFX e1 ir arave-lo/B0 ir
SFX e1 ir arà-lo/B0 ir
SFX e1 ir aràe-lo/B0 ir
SFX e1 ir aràelo/B0 ir
SFX e1 ir aràvelo/B0 ir
SFX e1 ir arémolo/G1 ir
SFX e1 ir arémomelo/G1 ir
SFX e1 ir aríe-lo/B0 ir
SFX e1 ir aríelo/B0 ir
SFX e1 ir aríselo/Q1 ir
SFX e1 ir elo/B0 ir
SFX e1 ir eralo/B0 ir
SFX e1 ir erave-lo/B0 ir
SFX e1 ir erà-lo/B0 ir
SFX e1 ir eràe-lo/B0 ir
SFX e1 ir eràelo/B0 ir
SFX e1 ir eràvelo/B0 ir
SFX e1 ir erémolo/G1 ir
SFX e1 ir erémomelo/G1 ir
SFX e1 ir eríe-lo/B0 ir
SFX e1 ir eríelo/B0 ir
SFX e1 ir eríselo/Q1 ir
SFX e1 ir eve-lo/B0 ir
SFX e1 ir é-lo/B0 ir
SFX e1 ir ée-lo/B0 ir
SFX e1 ir éelo/B0 ir
SFX e1 ir éndolo/G1 ir
SFX e1 ir éndomelo/G1 ir
SFX e1 ir éntolo/G1 ir
SFX e1 ir éntomelo/G1 ir
SFX e1 ir évelo/B0 ir
SFX e1 ir í-lo/B0 ir
SFX e1 ir íe-lo/B0 ir
SFX e1 ir íelo/B0 ir
SFX e1 ir índolo/G1 ir
SFX e1 ir índomelo/G1 ir
SFX e1 ir íntolo/G1 ir
SFX e1 ir íntomelo/G1 ir
SFX e1 ir íselo/B0 ir
SFX e1 ir ísilo/G1 ir
SFX e1 ir ísimelo/G1 ir
SFX e1 ir ísolo/G1 ir
SFX e1 ir ísomelo/G1 ir
SFX e1 ir ónmelo/G1 ir
SFX e1 r lo/G1 ir
SFX e1 r se-lo/B0 ir
SFX e1 r ónmelo/G1 [^cijɉñ]ir

# vèrbi -<is>ír/-ír
# themeT1 + r/a0a1a2e0e1e2E0E1E2
# themeT8 + o/e0e1e2E0E1E2J0
SFX e2 Y 49
SFX e2 0 ƚo/G2 ir
SFX e2 ir arave-ƚo/B0 ir
SFX e2 ir araƚo/B0 ir
SFX e2 ir arà-ƚo/B0 ir
SFX e2 ir aràe-ƚo/B0 ir
SFX e2 ir aràeƚo/B0 ir
SFX e2 ir aràveƚo/B0 ir
SFX e2 ir arémomeƚo/G2 ir
SFX e2 ir arémoƚo/G2 ir
SFX e2 ir aríe-ƚo/B0 ir
SFX e2 ir aríeƚo/B0 ir
SFX e2 ir aríseƚo/Q2 ir
SFX e2 ir erave-ƚo/B0 ir
SFX e2 ir eraƚo/B0 ir
SFX e2 ir erà-ƚo/B0 ir
SFX e2 ir eràe-ƚo/B0 ir
SFX e2 ir eràeƚo/B0 ir
SFX e2 ir eràveƚo/B0 ir
SFX e2 ir erémomeƚo/G2 ir
SFX e2 ir erémoƚo/G2 ir
SFX e2 ir eríe-ƚo/B0 ir
SFX e2 ir eríeƚo/B0 ir
SFX e2 ir eríseƚo/Q2 ir
SFX e2 ir eve-ƚo/B0 ir
SFX e2 ir eƚo/B0 ir
SFX e2 ir é-ƚo/B0 ir
SFX e2 ir ée-ƚo/B0 ir
SFX e2 ir éeƚo/B0 ir
SFX e2 ir éndomeƚo/G2 ir
SFX e2 ir éndoƚo/G2 ir
SFX e2 ir éntomeƚo/G2 ir
SFX e2 ir éntoƚo/G2 ir
SFX e2 ir éveƚo/B0 ir
SFX e2 ir í-ƚo/B0 ir
SFX e2 ir íe-ƚo/B0 ir
SFX e2 ir íeƚo/B0 ir
SFX e2 ir índomeƚo/G2 ir
SFX e2 ir índoƚo/G2 ir
SFX e2 ir íntomeƚo/G2 ir
SFX e2 ir íntoƚo/G2 ir
SFX e2 ir íseƚo/B0 ir
SFX e2 ir ísimeƚo/G2 ir
SFX e2 ir ísiƚo/G2 ir
SFX e2 ir ísomeƚo/G2 ir
SFX e2 ir ísoƚo/G2 ir
SFX e2 ir ónmeƚo/G2 ir
SFX e2 r se-ƚo/B0 ir
SFX e2 r ónmeƚo/G2 [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX e2 r ƚo/G2 ir
