public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/test.dic
malvestir/a0a1a2e0e1e2E0E1E2
vertir/a0a1a2e0e1e2E0E1E2r0-0@0:0
vèrto/a0e0e1e2E0E1E2I0J0@0:0
divertir/a0a1a2e0e1e2E0E1E2r0
partir/a0a1a2e0e1e2E0E1E2s0s1+0-0*0.0,0:0
skonpartir/a0a1a2e0e1e2E0E1E2
vertir/a0a1a2e0e1e2E0E1E2r0-0@0:0
vèrto/a0e0e1e2E0E1E2I0J0@0:0
divertir/a0a1a2e0e1e2E0E1E2r0
pervertir/a0a1a2e0e1e2E0E1E2
sovertir/a0a1a2e0e1e2E0E1E2
subvertir/a0a1a2e0e1e2E0E1E2
konparo/a0e0e1e2E0E1E2I0J0+0.0*0
